src/fst/stems/content.lexd
b á ngto<K> : # A kind of bamboo without thorns !{bángtò}
b á ngto : # A small piece !{bángto}
b a ngúd : # Reason !{bangúd}
b a ngúd : # On account of !{bangúd}
b á nhaw : # To rise from the dead !{bánhaw}
b á nhay : # A rise in the ground !{bánhay}
b á nhog : # To get loose or lose connection with !{bánhog}
b á nhot : # A kind of shrub whose strong-fibred bark is much employed in the making of ropes !{bánhot}
b a níg : # A mat for a bed !{baníg}
b a níg : # To be plentiful !{baníg}
b a ni hót # Careless and negligent in the execution of orders !{banihót}
b a ní klan # (B) A piece of split bamboo or wood !{baníklan}
b a ní lad # To spread !{banílad}
b a ni -ól # (B) To jam !{bani-ól}
b a ní slak # (B) Splint !{baníslak}
b á nka : # (Sp. banca) A kind of boat !{bánka}
b á nkil : # Tusk !{bánkil}
b a nkí te # (Sp. banquete) Banquet !{bankíte}
b a nkí ya # (Probably from the Sp. banca) !{bankíya}
b á nko<K> : # (Sp. banco) Form !{bánkò, bánko}
b a nko lít # The fine covering of a grain of rice !{bankolít}
b a nko litón # Pertaining to !{bankolitón}
b á nlas : # Desert !{bánlas}
b á nlo<K> : # The fibre of buri-palm leaves !{bánlò}
b a nóg : # Hawk !{banóg}
b a nóg : # (B) A swelling !{banóg}
b á nok : # (B) To be quiet !{bánok}
b á nol : # (B) To keep quiet !{bánol}
b a nsá da # (Sp. avanzada) Exposed to the wind !{bansáda}
b á nsag : # Nickname !{bánsag}
b á nsag : # Praise !{bánsag}
b a nsá gon # Highly esteemed or appreciated !{banságon}
b a nsá lan # Rudder !{bansálan}
b á nsi : # A kind of small fish !{bánsi}
b á nsil : # A cog !{bánsil}
b á nsok : # To drive into a corner !{bánsok}
b a nsú li<K> # To turn head over heels !{bansúlì}
b á nta<K> : # Opinion !{bántà}
b a ntá -bánta<K> # Dim of bántà !{bantâ-bántà}
b á ntal : # (H) To bundle or wrap up !{bántal}
b a ntá la<K> # Announcement !{bantálà}
b a nta láan # A kind of large fish growing to about two metres in length !{bantaláan}
b á ntang : # (B) Level !{bántang}
b á ntay : # Watch !{bántay}
b a ntá yan # Guard-house !{bantáyan}
b á ntil : # To squeeze and twist !{bántil}
b a ntí ling # A kind of very hard stone !{bantíling}
b a nti língon # Pertaining to— !{bantilíngon}
b á nting : # To tie down !{bánting}
b a ntó lid # To tumble or roll down headlong or head foremost !{bantólid}
b a nto línaw # Ebony !{bantolínaw}
b á ntot : # Slow !{bántot}
b á ntud : # A field or enclosure on high or raised ground: a clearing !{bántud}
b a ntú dan # A small !{bantúdan}
b á ntug : # Famous !{bántug}
b á ntuk : # A small roundish piece of anything !{bántuk}
b a ntú tut # A toy-whistle !{bantútut}
b a nú yo # A tree and its valuable timber !{banúyo}
b á nwa : # Town !{bánwa}
b a nwa hánon # Pertaining or belonging to a town !{banwahánon}
b a nyá -bánya # To see-saw !{banyá-bánya}
b a nyá das # (Sp. bañada) A kind of soft cake !{banyádas}
b a nyá ga<K> # Rascal !{banyágà}
b á nyo : # (Sp. baño) Bath !{bányo}
b á nyos : # (Sp. baño) Ointment !{bányos}
b a ó : # A kind of small tortoise !{baó}
b a ó -báo # Dim !{baó-báo}
b á -og : # (B) A small fish often salted and dried !{bá-og}
b a -óg : # Gray !{ba-óg}
b á -og : # Bad !{bá-og}
b a -óng : # A kind of creeper with edible roots !{ba-óng}
b á -os : # A deep boil or ulcer !{bá-os}
b á -ot : # (B) To be on good terms !{bá-ot}
b a pór : # (Sp. vapor) Steam-boat !{bapór}
b a rá : # (Sp. varar) To run aground !{bará}
b á ra : # (Sp. vara !{bára}
b a rá bad # See balábad !{barábad}
b a ra dlísan # (B) See baladlísan id !{baradlísan}
b a ra gbáon # (B) Cause !{baragbáon}
b a rá ghal # Coarse !{barághal}
b a ra góok # (B) Very fat !{baragóok}
b a rá ha # (Sp. baraja) A pack of cards !{baráha}
b a ra hán # The measure of a yard !{barahán}
b a rá hus # (B) To wrap up !{baráhus}
b á rak : # Murmur !{bárak}
b a rá ka # (Sp. barraca) Barrack !{baráka}
b a ra káng # See balakáng !{barakáng}
b a rá k-barák # Dim !{barák-barák}
b a rá king # (B) To tuck up the skirt !{baráking}
b a rá lbal # (B) Cane !{barálbal}
b a rá lkan # (B) See balálkan !{barálkan}
b a rá mbad # (B) To wind or twist round !{barámbad}
b a ra ndílya # (Sp. barandilla) Railing !{barandílya}
b á rang : # An evil spell producing sickness !{bárang}
b a rá ngon # (B) A kind of very savoury banana !{barángon}
b a rá rang # An addition to the rim of a basket so as to increase its capacity !{barárang}
b a rá sag # Lying about in disorder !{barásag}
b a ra táan # (B) Uterus !{baratáan}
b a ra tángan # (B) See balatángan—​couch !{baratángan}
b a rá to # (Sp. barato) Cheap !{baráto}
b a ra -úd # (B) See bala-ód !{bara-úd}
b a ráw : # Spotted !{baráw}
b a ráw : # A very poisonous snake !{baráw}
b a rá w-báraw # Dim !{baráw-báraw}
b a rá y-báray # To be stiff !{baráy-báray}
b a rá ydan # (B) Payment !{baráydan}
b a ra yóbay # (B) See balayóbay id !{barayóbay}
b a rá ywon # (B) Rice to be pounded !{baráywon}
b á rba : # (Sp. barba) Beard !{bárba}
b a rbá ban # Bearded !{barbában}
b a rbé ro # (Sp. barbero) Barber !{barbéro}
b a rbón : # (Sp. barbon) Bristly !{barbón}
b a ré u # A plant !{baréu}
b a réw : # See baréu !{baréw}
b á rhong : # See bálhong—​to swell !{bárhong}
b á rho : # See bálhot—​to respect !{bárho}
b á ri<K> : # (B) See bálî—​to break !{bárì}
b a rí<K> : # (B) See balî—​broken !{barî}
b a rí kas # (B) See balíkas—​to scratch !{baríkas}
b a ri kótot # See balikótot—​to contort (the limbs) !{barikótot}
b a ríl : # (Sp. barril) Barrel !{baríl}
b a rí na # (Sp. barrena) An auger !{barína}
b a ri ngáy # A river-crab !{baringáy}
b a rí no # (Sp. barreno) A large auger !{baríno}
b a ri nóhon # One subject to frequent fits of ill temper !{barinóhon}
b á ri o # (Sp. barrio) Village hamlet !{bário}
b a rí ra # (B) See balíla—​reed (of a loom) !{baríra}
b a ri rá # (B) See balilá—​a kind of fish !{barirá}
b a rí ri # A kind of grass and its seeds !{baríri}
b a rís : # Fierceness !{barís}
b a rít : # To sharpen !{barít}
b a rí ta # (Sp. barreta) Anything in the shape of a bar or cake !{baríta}
t a bá ng-tábang # Dim !{tabáng-tábang}
t a bás : # Red and white !{tabás}
t á bas : # The cut of clothes !{tábas}
t a báw : # A kind of rice !{tabáw}
t á bgan : # From tabúg—​to fly away !{tábgan}
t á bi<K> : # A polite expression frequently used when passing another on the road !{tábì}
t a bíd : # To tie— !{tabíd}
t á bid : # To hang together !{tábid}
t a bíd : # Appendage !{tabíd}
t a bíg : # The ordinary rice-harvesting basket made of bamboo splints !{tabíg}
t a bí gi # A kind of mangrove !{tabígi}
t a bi láng # To do or say something thoughtlessly !{tabiláng}
t a bi nás # To stumble against (on !{tabinás}
t á bing : # To stitch or sew together a tear in a garment !{tábing}
t a bi ós # A kind of very small fish much esteemed for food !{tabiós}
t a bi rís # To trickle down !{tabirís}
t a bís : # A term much used in games: Out !{tabís}
t a bís : # Punishment !{tabís}
t a bí -tábi<K> # Dim !{tabî-tábì}
t a bí yog # To drop !{tabíyog}
t á bla<K> : # To stop !{táblà}
t a blá do # (Sp. tablado) Scaffold !{tabládo}
t á blaw : # To suppress !{táblaw}
t a blí ya # (Sp. tablilla) Tablet !{tablíya}
t á blog : # (B) To throw !{táblog}
t a blón : # (Sp. tablón) A large piece of timber !{tablón}
t á bnul : # Thickness !{tábnul}
t á bnus : # To snatch or tear away !{tábnus}
t a bó<K> : # An event !{tabô, tabû}
t á bo<K> : # To meet !{tábò}
t a bók : # The opposite (other) side or bank !{tabók}
t a bón : # Cover !{tabón}
t á bon : # To cover !{tábon}
t a bó n-ak # A kind of reed that somewhat resembles the sugar-cane !{tabón-ak}
t a bo nána<K> # Flaccid !{tabonánà}
t á bong : # A kind of tree !{tábong}
t a bo ngáw # (B) To look on !{tabongáw}
t a bo ngós # A kind of basket !{tabongós}
t á bos : # To penetrate !{tábos, tabós}
t a bó -tabó # The outer covering !{tabó-tabó}
t á boy : # To hang or bend down !{táboy}
t a brí ya # See tablíya !{tabríya}
t á btab : # To cut through !{tábtab}
t a btá ban # The cutting or severing of something !{tabtában}
t a búg : # (B) To fly !{tabúg}
t á bug : # To drive away !{tábug}
t a bu gí<K> # Plait !{tabugî}
t a bú g-lamók # One who drives away mosquitoes !{tabúg-lamók}
t a bu kánon # One living beyond or on the other (farther) side of a boundary !{tabukánon}
t a bu káw # A kind of very malignant !{tabukáw}
t a bu kawón # Affected with or pertaining to tabukáw !{tabukawón}
t a bu láli # A kind of plant somewhat resembling talóng—​egg-plant !{tabuláli}
t a bu lí<K> # Upside down !{tabulî}
t a bú l-tabúl # To swing or shake to and fro as a basket carried on a pole !{tabúl-tabúl}
t a bu ngós # A wicker basket made of bamboo splints !{tabungós}
t a bú -tabú # See tabó-tabó—​the exterior covering of a silk worm’s chrysalis !{tabú-tabú}
t a bú yug # A kind of (useless) tree !{tabúyug}
t á dag : # To step on or in !{tádag}
t á dhan : # Having a (large) spur !{tádhan}
t a di áw # A large earthen pot or jar for containing water !{tadiáw, tádiaw}
t á dlong : # Straightness !{tádlong}
t á dong : # (B) To behave !{tádong}
t á dtad : # Flooring or matting of split and flattened-out bamboo !{tádtad}
t á duk : # (B) To take a short cut !{táduk}
t á dul : # To measure !{tádul}
t á dya<K> : # To measure !{tádyà}
t a dyáw : # See tadiáw !{tadyáw, tádyaw}
t a g : # - !{tag}
t a g- : # A prefix denoting ownership or actual performance of what is implied by the term which it is attached to !{tag-}
t a ga- : # A prefix denoting !{taga-}
t a gá<K> : # A large fish-hook !{tagâ}
t a gá<K> : # A word !{tagâ}
t á ga<K> : # To give !{tágà}
t á ga<K> : # To get ready any kind of weapon for an attack or defense !{tágà}
t a gá bang # A vegetable plant whose oily leaves greatly facilitate the act of swallowing !{tagábang}
t a gád : # An iron-pointed bar or dibble used in digging !{tagád}
t á gad : # See tagád !{tágad}
t á gak : # To knot or bind hemp-fibre together and roll it up neatly in a basket (tagakán) preparatory to weaving or reeling !{tágak}
t a ga kán # The basket used in the operation of tágak !{tagakán}
t a gál : # To impel !{tagál, tágal}
t a gá la # A Tagalog woman !{tagála}
t a ga láling # (H) Milling time !{tagaláling}
t a ga láni # Time of harvest !{tagaláni}
t a gá log # A male Tagalog !{tagálog}
t a gá ltal # To rattle !{tagáltal}
t a gám : # To be careful !{tagám}
t a gá mbay # Small !{tagámbay}
t a gá mhay # Small !{tagámhay}
t a gá mtam # To taste !{tagámtam}
t a ga nák # Father !{taganák}
t á gas : # A flow of blood !{tágas}
t á g-as : # High !{tág-as}
t a ga sák # A slap !{tagasák}
t a gá -tága<K> # Mantis !{tagâ-tágà}
t a gá -tagá<K> # Dim !{tagâ-tagâ}
t a gá wtaw # Very tall !{tagáwtaw}
t á gay : # To offer !{tágay}
t a ga yán # A cup !{tagayán}
t a gba láy # Master !{tagbaláy}
t a gba láyon # A new unfinished house !{tagbaláyon}
t á gbas : # See tábas—​to cut clothes !{tágbas}
t a gbá ta<K> # Father !{tagbátà}
t á gbaw : # To fly off (away) to a great distance !{tágbaw}
t á gbo<K> : # To meet !{tágbò}
t á gbon : # From tagúb—​to sheathe !{tágbon, tágban}
t á gbong : # To be heavy !{tágbong}
t á gbong : # To cast overboard !{tágbong}
t á gboy : # To cling to !{tágboy}
t á gduk : # A cupping glass !{tágduk}
t á gduk : # A fence post !{tágduk}
t a ghá gna<K> # One who brings in a motion or is responsible for a bill !{taghágnà}
t á ghap : # To be apprehensive !{tághap}
t a ghi matá # Redness !{taghimatá}
t a ghi matá<K> # Relative !{taghimatâ}
t a ghi ríro # Branding season !{taghiríro}
t á ghol : # The bark !{tághol}
t á ghoy : # To sigh !{tághoy}
t á gik : # To bind— !{tágik}
t a gi lám-an # From tagiláum !{tagilám-an}
t a gi láum # To expect !{tagiláum}
t a gi línit # Hot or warm season !{tagilínit, tagilinít}
t a gí lyas # Charm !{tagílyas}
t a gi lyásan # The owner or wearer of an amulet called “tagílyas” !{tagilyásan}
